Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Assault and Battery Penalties Act of 2026".
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15106 GRS 01/05/26





Req. No. 15106 Page 1